New York, session 2025-2026, A6480.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "no severance ultimatums act". 3 § 2. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 215-d to read as 4 follows: 5 § 215-d. Prohibition against coercive severance ultimatums. 1. Defi- 6 nitions. For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall 7 have the following meanings: 8 (a) "Employee" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section one 9 hundred ninety of this chapter. 10 (b) "Employer" shall: 11 (i) have the same meaning as set forth in section one hundred ninety 12 of this chapter; and 13 (ii) include governmental agencies. 14 (c) "Severance agreement" shall mean an agreement offered by an 15 employer to an employee upon separation of employment and related to 16 such separation that requires such employee to release waivable claims 17 against their employer. 18 2. Severance ultimatums. Any employer offering an employee or former 19 employee a severance agreement shall notify such employee that: 20 (a) Such employee has the right to consult an attorney regarding such 21 agreement; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00738-04-5 A. 6480--A 2 1 (b) Such employee shall be provided with a consideration period of not 2 less than twenty-one calendar days within which to consider the agree- 3 ment; 4 (c) Such employee may revoke such agreement within seven calendar days 5 of the execution of such agreement, and the agreement shall not become 6 effective or enforceable until such revocation period has expired; and 7 (d) Such employee may sign such agreement prior to the end of the 8 consideration period set forth in paragraph (b) of this subdivision, as 9 long as such employee's decision to shorten such consideration period is 10 knowing, voluntary, and not induced by the employer through fraud, 11 misrepresentation, or a threat to withdraw or alter such consideration 12 period prior to the expiration of such consideration period, or by 13 providing different terms to such employee if such employee signs such 14 agreement prior to the expiration of such consideration period. 15 3. The provisions of this section may be waived by any severance 16 agreement that specifically acknowledges the provisions of this section 17 and negotiated pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement. 18 4. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any severance agree- 19 ment shall be deemed void and unenforceable if it violates the 20 provisions of subdivision two of this section. 21 5. Nothing herein shall be deemed in any way to limit, restrict, or 22 impair any law, rule, or regulation from providing greater protections 23 than provided for in this section. 24 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.